Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 4 Georgia Police Academy

35-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the “Georgia Police Academy Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 1.

35-4-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Academy” means the Georgia Police Academy.

“Police officer” means any law enforcement officer charged with the duty of enforcing the criminal laws and ordinances of the state or of the counties or municipalities of the state who is employed by and compensated by the state or any county or municipality of the state or who is elected and compensated on a fee basis. The term shall include, but not be limited to, members of the department, municipal police, county police, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, wardens, guards, agents and investigators of the State Forestry Commission, game wardens of the Department of Natural Resources, and agents of the Department of Revenue.

“State” means the State of Georgia and any department, board, bureau, commission, or other agency thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in the last sentence of paragraph (2).

35-4-3.
Academy assigned to department for administrative purposes.

The academy is assigned to the Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes only as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, § 5.

35-4-4.
Powers and duties of board as to establishment, operation, and maintenance of academy generally.

The board is authorized to establish, operate, and maintain the Georgia Police Academy for the purpose of training police officers and others as provided in this chapter and to do all things and take whatever action is necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the establishment of training standards and programs and the promulgation of rules and regulations relative thereto.

The board is authorized and directed to select a site for the academy.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, §§ 3, 6.

35-4-5.
Acceptance of gifts, grants, donations, property, and services by board.

The board is authorized to accept gifts, grants, donations, property, both real and personal, and services for the purposes of carrying out this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, § 5.

35-4-6.
Selection, powers, and duties of superintendent of academy.

The board shall hire a superintendent of the academy whose duties shall be to administer the policies and programs of the board regarding the academy.

The superintendent shall be responsible to the board for the management and control of the academy and shall report directly to the board.

In administering the policies and programs of the board, the superintendent shall seek the assistance of the State Board of Education, which is authorized and directed to cooperate and work with the superintendent.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 311, § 1.

35-4-7.
Academy training programs available to police and other persons; fees and enrollment at academy; state, municipalities, and counties authorized to pay academy fees.

Subject to rules and regulations prescribed by the board, the training programs at the academy shall be made available to all police officers and may also be made available to other persons who evidence interest in entering the law enforcement profession.

The board is authorized to prescribe by rules and regulations fees to cover all or a part of the cost of furnishing such training.

The state and municipalities and counties of the state are authorized to expend funds for the purpose of paying the fees provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

The board is given full authority to decide who shall be allowed to enroll in the training programs at the academy.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35.

35-4-8.
Training program for coroners and deputy coroners.

Subject to rules and regulations prescribed by the board, the academy shall make available to all coroners and deputy coroners in the state at least once annually a training program of at least 16 hours of instruction including, but not limited to, the following: Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, the “Georgia Death Investigation Act”; all laws pertaining to the duties of coroners; and investigating technique. The board is authorized to charge such tuition as may be necessary to defray the expense of such training and is also authorized to accept appropriations from any governmental unit or gifts or grants for such purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 543, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 35.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding training program for coroners and deputy coroners, § 45-16-60 et seq.

35-4-9.
Attendance not required; academy training programs not to supersede other programs.

It is not the intention of this chapter that it be mandatory that any police officer be required to attend the academy. The training program established at the academy shall not supersede any other training program for police officers but shall be separate and apart from any other training program for police officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 535, § 7.